North Carolina, session 2025, SB601.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 116-280 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-280. Definitions.
The following definitions apply to this Article:
…
(3) Eligible private postsecondary institution. – A school that is any of the
following:
a. A nonprofit postsecondary educational institution with a main
permanent campus located in this State that is not owned or operated
by the State of North Carolina or by an agency or political subdivision
of the State or by any combination thereof that satisfies all of the
following:
1. Is either (i) accredited by a regional accrediting agency, as
defined in G.S. 115D-6.2 and G.S. 116-11.4, or the
Transnational Association of Christian Colleges and Schools
or (ii) was accredited by SACSCOC on January 1, 2021, and,
beginning January 1, 2021, was a member of the Transnational
Association of Christian Colleges and Schools.
2. Awards a postsecondary degree as defined in G.S. 116-15.
a1. A postsecondary educational institution with a permanent campus
located in this State that is not owned or operated by the State of North
Carolina or an agency or political subdivision of the State or by any
combination thereof that satisfies all of the following:
1. Is accredited by Southern Association of Colleges and Schools
Commission on Colleges (SACSCOC) and designated by
SACSCOC as a level VI degree-granting institution.
2. Awards a postsecondary degree as defined in G.S. 116-15.
b. A postsecondary institution owned or operated by a hospital authority
as defined in G.S. 131E-16(14) or school of nursing affiliated with a
nonprofit postsecondary educational institution as defined in
sub-subdivision a. of this subsection.
*S601-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Main permanent campus. – A campus owned by the eligible private
postsecondary institution that provides permanent on-premises housing, food
services, and classrooms with full-time faculty members and administration
that engages in postsecondary degree activity as defined in G.S. 116-15.
(4a) Permanent campus. – A campus owned by an eligible private postsecondary
institution that provides permanent classrooms with full-time faculty members
and administration that engages in postsecondary degree activity as defined in
G.S. 116-15.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 116-209.100(1)c. reads as rewritten:
"c. A nonprofitAn eligible private postsecondary institution as defined in
G.S. 116-280(3)."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
scholarships awarded in the 2025-2026 academic year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 601-First Edition